en: Raw farmed Mediterranean bass
fr: Loup de Méditerranée cru d'élevage
it: spigola mediterranea allevata cruda

en: swordfish
af: Swaardvis
ar: سمكة السيف
az: Qılıncbalıq
be: Меч-рыба
bg: риба меч
br: Beg-sabrenn
ca: peix espasa
cs: mečoun obecný
cy: Pysgodyn Cleddyf
da: Sværdfisk
de: Schwertfisch
dv: ތުންގަނޑު ހިބަރު
el: Ξιφίας
eo: Spadofiŝo
es: pez espada, emperador
et: Mõõkkala
eu: Ezpata-arrain
fa: شمشیرماهی
fi: Miekkakala
fr: espadon, espadon pêché en océan Pacifique ou Indien
ga: Colgán
gl: Peixe espada
he: דג חרב
hr: iglun
hu: Kardhal
id: Todak
io: Espad-fisho
is: Sverðfiskur
it: Pesce spada
ja: メカジキ
ka: შიმშერი
kk: Семсер балық
kn: ಕತ್ತಿ ಮೀನು
ko: 황새치
ky: Селебебалык
la: Xiphias gladius
lt: Durklažuvė
lv: zobenzivs
mk: сабјарка
nb: sverdfisk
nl: Zwaardvis
nv: Łóóʼ bíchį́į́h nineezí
oc: peis espada
or: ସ୍ବୋର୍ଡ ମାଛ
pl: Włócznik
pt: espadarte
ro: Pește spadă
ru: меч-рыба
sh: Iglun
sv: Svärdfisk
ta: கத்தி மீன்
th: ปลากระโทงดาบ
tr: Kılıç balığı
tt: кылыч-балык
uk: Риба-меч
vi: Cá kiếm
wa: Espadon
zh: 劍旗魚科

en: trout
ar: أسماك التروتة
az: Alabalıq
bg: Пъстърва
ca: truita
cs: pstruh
cv: Ăркай
cy: brithyll
de: Forellen, Forelle
eo: Truto
es: Trucha, trucha de cria
et: Forell
eu: Amuarrain
fa: قزل‌آلا
fi: taimen
fo: Síl
fr: truite
ga: Breac
gd: Breac
gl: Troita
he: טרוטה
hr: pastrve
ht: Twit
hu: Pisztráng
hy: Կարմրախայտ
id: Trout
io: Truto
it: trota
ja: マス
ka: კალმახები
kk: Бақтақ
ko: 송어류
ku: Deqsor
la: Tructa
lt: Upėtakis
lv: Forele
ml: ട്രൗട്ട്
my: ထရောက်ငါး
ne: ट्राउट
nl: forel
pl: Pstrąg
pt: truta
ro: Păstrăv
ru: Форель
sk: Pstruh
sq: Trofta
sv: Öring
tl: Trutsa
tr: Alabalık
uk: Пструг
uz: Gulmoyi
vi: Cá hương
zh: 鱒魚

en: farmed trout
fr: truite d'élevage
it: trota d'allevamento

en: Sea trout
fr: Truite de mer
it: trota di mare

en: rainbow trout
af: Reënboogforel
az: Al-əlvan qızılxallı
be: Стронга радужная
bg: дъгова пъстърва
bn: রেইনবো ট্রাউট
br: Dluzh kanevedenn
bs: Kalifornijska pastrmka
ca: truita arc de Sant Martí
cs: pstruh duhový
cy: Brithyll Seithliw
da: Regnbueørred
de: Regenbogenforelle, Lachsforellen
eo: Ĉielarka truto
es: Trucha arcoiris
et: Vikerforell
eu: Ortzadar-amuarrain
fa: قزل‌آلای رنگین‌کمان
fi: kirjolohi
fr: truite arc-en-ciel, truite saumonée
gl: Troita arco da vella
he: טרוטת עין-הקשת
hr: kalifornijska pastrva
hu: Szivárványos pisztráng
hy: ծիածանախայտ
is: Regnbogasilungur
it: rota iridea, trota salmonata
ja: ニジマス
kk: Құбылмалы бахтах
ko: 무지개송어
ky: Микижа
la: Oncorhynchus mykiss
lb: Reeboufrell
lt: Vaivorykštinis upėtakis
mk: Калифорниска пастрмка
ml: റെയിൻബോ ട്രൗട്ട്
nb: Regnbueørret
nl: regenboogforel
nn: Regnbogeaure
pl: Pstrąg tęczowy
pt: Truta-arco-íris
ro: Păstrăv curcubeu
ru: Микижа
sh: Kalifornijska pastrva
sk: Pstruh dúhový
sl: Šarenka
sr: Калифорнијска пастрмка
sv: Regnbågsöring
th: ปลาเรนโบว์เทราต์
tl: Trutsang bahaghari
tr: Gökkuşağı alabalığı
uk: Пструг райдужний
vi: Cá hồi vân
zh: 虹鱒

en: farmed Rainbow trout
fr: Truite arc en ciel d'élevage
it: trota iridea d'allevamento

en: raw salmon trout
fr: Truite saumonée cru
it: trota salmonata cruda

en: smoked rainbow trout
da: røget regnbueørred
de: geräucherte Regenbogenforelle
es: trucha arcoiris ahumada, trucha arcoiris ahumado, trucha arcoíris ahumada
fi: savustettu kirjolohi
fr: Truite arc-en-ciel fumée
hr: dimljena kalifornijska pastrva
it: trota iridea affumicata

en: rainbow trout fillet
de: Regenbogenforellenfilet
fi: kirjolohifilee
fr: Filethe de truite arc-en-ciel
hr: file kalifornijske pastrve
it: filetto di trota iridea

en: arctic char
ar: شار قطبي شمالي
br: Kofruz arktikel
bs: Jezerska zlatovčica
ca: Truita àrtica
cs: siven severní
cy: Torgoch
da: Fjeldørred
de: Seesaibling
es: salvelino
et: arktika paalia
eu: Amuarrain artiko
fa: قزل‌آلای آلپ
fi: nieriä
fo: Bleikja
fr: Omble chevalier
ga: Ruabhreac
hr: arktički char
is: Bleikja
it: Salmerino alpino
ja: 北極イワナ
ka: არქტიკული გოჭალა
kk: Даватчан
la: Salvelinus alpinus
nb: røye
nl: Trekzalm
nn: Røye
pl: Golec zwyczajny
ru: Арктический голец
sr: Језерска златовчица
sv: Fjällröding
uk: Палія арктична
zh: 北極紅點鮭

en: raw Arctic char raw
fr: Omble chevalier cru
it: salmerino artico crudo crudo

en: tub gurnard, Surmullet, red mullet
br: Talgorn
ca: lluerna rossa
cs: štítník červený
de: Roter Knurrhahn
eu: Perloi handi
fi: Isokurnusimppu
fr: rouget, rouget barbet, Rouget-barbet de roche
gl: Escacho
hr: kada gurnard
it: gallinella d'acqua
ja: タブ・ガーナード
ky: Деңиз короозу
la: Trigla lucerna, Chelidonichthys lucerna
nl: rode poon
pl: Kurek czerwony
ru: Жёлтая тригла
sv: Fenknot
uk: Морський півень жовтий
zh: 細鱗綠鰭魚

en: raw tub gurnard
fr: Grondin perlon cru
it: triglia di mare cruda

en: turbot
fi: piikkikampela
fr: turbot
hr: rumba, rumbača kvrgaša, Scophthalmus maximus
it: rombo

en: Farmed turbot, turbot from farming
fr: Turbot d'élevage
it: rombo d'allevamento

en: wild turbot
fr: Turbot sauvage
it: rombo selvatico

en: weever
ar: الطرخين
bg: драконови
br: Morzer
ca: Traquínid
de: Petermännchen
el: Δράκαινα
eu: Xabiroi
fa: زهرماهی
fi: Louhikalat
fr: vive
he: דרקוניים
hr: weever
it: tracina
ka: ზღვის დრაკონი
ko: 동미리과
la: Trachinidae
lt: Drakoniukinės
mk: морски змејчиња
nb: Fjesinger
nl: Pietermannen
pl: Ostroszowate
sv: Fjärsingfiskar
tr: Trakonya
uk: Дракончикові
zh: 鱷鱚科

en: whiting, merling
bg: мерланг
br: Merlank
ca: merlà
cs: treska bezvousá
cy: Gwyniad Môr
da: Hvilling
de: Wittling
eo: Merlango
es: Merlán
eu: Liba
fa: سفیدگون
fi: Valkoturska
fo: Hvítingur
fr: merlan
ga: Faoitín
gd: Cuiteag
gl: Merlán
hr: pišmolj
ht: Melan
hu: Vékonybajszú tőkehal
io: Merlano
is: Lýsa
it: Merlango
ja: ホワイティング
ka: მერლანგი
kk: Мерланг
la: Merlangius merlangus
nb: hvitting
nl: wijting
pl: Witlinek
ru: Мерланг
sl: Mol
sv: Vitling
tr: Bakalyaro
uk: Мерланг
zh: 牙鱈

en: greater argentine
ca: argentina silus
cs: stříbrnice atlantská
cy: pysgodyn arian mawr
de: goldlachs
es: argentina silus
eu: argentina silus
fi: kultakuore
fo: gullaksur
hr: veći argentinski
is: gulllax
it: maggiore argentino
la: argentina silus, salmo silus
nb: vassild, hvitlaks, kvitlaks
nl: grote zilversmelt
nn: vassild
pl: argentyna wielka
sv: guldlax
zh: 大西洋水珍魚